Massachusetts, session 194th, H4694.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of Chapter 40A of the General laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after the word “corporation” in line 57, the
following words:- or by a housing authority for creation of affordable or public housing purposes
of 1